Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4106.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025 from the funds indicated in this part. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this part: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 20,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 20,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 20,000,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 20,000,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 20,000,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 20,000,000 (2) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS Mothering justice small business assistance fund $ 20,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 20,000,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 20,000,000 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2024-2025 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is $20,000,000.00 and state spending under part 1 from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY Sec. 301. (1) The mothering justice small business assistance fund is created within the department of treasury. (2) The funds appropriated in part 1 for mothering justice small business assistance fund shall be deposited into the mothering justice small business assistance fund created under this 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 section. (3) All money in the fund is appropriated and is available for expenditure. Expenditures are limited to support purposes as specified in this section. The department may expend an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for administrative expenses incurred under this section. (4) As used in this section, "small business" means a for- profit business that is independently owned and operated and has 25 employees or fewer than 25 employees. (5) A small business may receive a distribution from the fund to defray the costs and to ease the impact on the small business from the supreme court decision in Mothering Justice v Attorney General, ___ Mich ___; ___ NW2d ___ (2024) (Docket No. 165325). (6) The department shall require payroll and employee attendance records for the previous 2 years to determine the future impact on payroll. The department may require any other information the department considers necessary to determine the amount of distribution from the fund for a small business. (7) Distributions from the fund shall not exceed $20,000.00 for a small business. (8) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for mothering justice small business assistance fund are designated as a work project appropriation. Unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditures under this section until the project has been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: (a) The purpose of the project is to defray the costs and ease the impact on small businesses of increasing the hourly minimum 1 2 3 4 5 wage and allowing employees to earn paid sick leave. (b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state employees, contracts with service providers, or both. (c) The total estimated cost of the project is $20,000,000.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2029.